Hawaii statutes.
[§11-410] Administrative fines;
relief. (a) The commission may make a decision or issue an order
affecting any person violating any provision of this part or section 281-22
that may provide for the assessment of an administrative fine as follows:

(1) If an individual, an amount not to exceed $1,000
for each occurrence or an amount equivalent to three times the amount of an
unlawful contribution or expenditure; or

(2) If a corporation, organization, association, or
labor union, an amount not to exceed $1,000 for each occurrence;

provided that whenever a corporation, organization,
association, or labor union violates this part, the violation may be deemed to
be also that of the individual directors, officers, or agents of the
corporation, organization, association, or labor union, who have knowingly
authorized, ordered, or done any of the acts constituting the violation.

(b) Any order for the assessment of an
administrative fine shall not be issued against a person without providing the
person written notice and an opportunity to be heard at a hearing conducted
under chapter 91. A person may waive these rights by written stipulation or
consent.

(c) If an administrative fine is imposed upon
a candidate, the commission may order that the fine, or any portion, be paid
from the candidate's personal funds.

(d) If the person to whom the commission's
order is directed does not comply with the order, the first circuit court, upon
application of the commission, shall issue an order requiring the person to comply
with the commission's order. Failure to obey such a court order shall be
punished as contempt.

(e) Any administrative fine collected by the
commission shall be deposited in the general fund of the State.

(f) Any person or the commission may sue for
injunctive relief to compel compliance with this part.

(g) The provisions of this section shall not
prohibit prosecution under any appropriate provision of the Hawaii Penal Code
or section 11-412.

(h) This section shall not apply to any person
who, prior to the commencement of proceedings under this section, has paid or
agreed to pay the fines prescribed by sections 11-340 and 11-391(b). [L 2010, c
211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next